California statutes. Civil Code
(B) Conspicuously state that a buyer who purchased a guaranteed asset protection waiver is generally entitled to a refund of the unearned portion of the guaranteed asset protection waiver charges on a pro rata basis upon early termination of their conditional sale contract or cancellation of the guaranteed asset protection waiver, and that the buyer should contact the administrator identified in the buyer’s guaranteed asset protection waiver, or any other appropriate person designated by the holder, for identification of the amount of such a refund available to the buyer at that time.

(b) (1) A guaranteed asset protection waiver terminates no later than the earliest of the following events:

(A) Cancellation of the guaranteed asset protection waiver by the buyer, as provided by paragraph (4).

(B) Payment in full by the buyer of the conditional sale contract.

(C) Expiration of any redemption and reinstatement periods after a repossession or surrender of the motor vehicle specified in the conditional sale contract pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2983.2.

(D) Upon total loss or unrecovered theft of the motor vehicle specified in the conditional sale contract, after the holder has applied all applicable benefits required under the guaranteed asset protection waiver.

(E) Upon any other event that occurs earlier than the events listed in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, as specified in the guaranteed asset protection waiver.

(2) Subject to paragraph (3), upon termination of a
 guaranteed asset protection waiver, the buyer is entitled to a refund as follows:

(A) If the termination occurs within 30 days after the date the buyer purchased the guaranteed asset protection waiver, the buyer is entitled to a full refund of the guaranteed asset protection waiver charges plus all finance charges attributable to the guaranteed asset protection waiver.

(B) (i) If the termination occurs later than 30 days after the date the buyer purchased the guaranteed asset protection waiver, the buyer is entitled to a refund of the unearned guaranteed asset protection waiver charges, which shall be calculated on a pro rata basis.

(ii) For the purposes of this subparagraph, “calculating a refund on a pro rata basis” shall require multiplying the total dollar amount of guaranteed asset
 protection waiver charges by the quotient of the number of calendar days from the termination date to the conditional sale contract’s original full term date, including the termination date as a full calendar day, divided by the total number of calendar days in the conditional sale contract’s original term.

(iii) Notwithstanding clause (ii), if the original full term of the conditional sale contract exceeded the original full term of the guaranteed asset protection waiver as of the date the buyer purchased the guaranteed asset protection waiver, “calculating a refund on a pro rata basis” shall require multiplying the total dollar amount of guaranteed asset protection waiver charges by the quotient of the number of calendar days from the termination date to the guaranteed asset protection waiver’s original full term date, including the termination date as a full calendar day, divided by the total number of calendar days in the guaranteed asset
 protection waiver’s original term.

(C) No refund is required upon termination if there has been a total loss or unrecovered theft of the motor vehicle specified in the conditional sale contract and the buyer has or will receive the benefit of the guaranteed asset protection waiver.

(3) Within 60 business days from the termination of a guaranteed asset protection waiver, the holder shall tender the refund required under paragraph (2) or shall cause to be made the refund under paragraph (2) by instructing in writing the administrator or any other appropriate party to make the refund.

(A) A refund owed under this section may be applied by the holder as a reduction of the amount owed under the conditional sale contract unless the conditional sale contract has been paid in full.

(B) Refunds owed under this section are not exclusive and shall be in addition to any other refunds provided for in this chapter.

(4) A guaranteed asset protection waiver may be canceled by the buyer at any time without penalty.

(5) A cancellation fee, termination fee, or similar fee shall not be assessed in connection with the termination of a guaranteed asset protection waiver.

(6) In addition to the requirements of Section 2984.5, the holder shall maintain records identifying any refund made and tendered under paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subdivision, including those refunds the holder instructed the administrator or other appropriate party to make, and provide electronic access to those records, in response to any subpoena or other administratively or
 judicially enforceable request, until four years after the date the refund was tendered.

(c) Any waiver of a provision of this section is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 16.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2983.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if the seller, except as the result of an accidental or bona fide error in computation, violates any provision of Section 2981.9, or of subdivision (a), (j), or (k) of Section 2982, the conditional sale contract shall not be enforceable, except by a bona fide purchaser, assignee, or pledgee for value, or until after the violation is corrected as provided in
Section 2984, and, if the violation is not corrected, the buyer may recover from the seller the total amount paid, pursuant to the terms of the contract, by the buyer to the seller or his or her assignee. The amount recoverable for property traded in as all or part of the downpayment shall be equal to the agreed cash value of the property as the value appears on the conditional sale contract or the fair market value of the property as of the time the contract is made, whichever is greater.

(b) A conditional sale contract executed or entered into on or after January 1, 2012, shall not be made unenforceable solely because of a violation by the seller of paragraph (2) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 2982. In addition to any other remedies that may be available, the buyer is entitled to any actual damages sustained as a result of a violation of those provisions. Nothing in this subdivision affects any legal rights, claims, or remedies
otherwise available under law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 11.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2983.1.

(a) If the seller or holder of a conditional sale contract, except as the result of an accidental or bona fide error of computation, violates any provision of subdivision (l) of Section 2982, the buyer may recover from the person three times the amount of any finance charge paid to that person.

(b) If a holder of a conditional sale contract that includes a guaranteed asset protection waiver, except as the result of an accidental or bona fide error of computation, violates any provision of subdivision (b) of Section 2982.12, the buyer may recover from the holder three times the amount of any guaranteed asset protection charges paid.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (f), if a holder acquires a conditional sale contract without actual knowledge of the violation by the seller of Section 2981.9, or of subdivision (a), (j), or (k) of Section 2982, the contract shall be valid and enforceable by the holder except the buyer is excused from payment of the unpaid finance charge, unless the violation is corrected as provided in Section 2984.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (f), if a holder acquires a conditional sale contract with knowledge of a violation of Section 2981.9, or of subdivision (a), (j), or (k) of Section 2982, the conditional sale contract shall not be enforceable except by a bona fide purchaser, assignee, or pledgee for value, or unless the violation is corrected as provided in Section 2984, and, if the violation is not corrected, the buyer
 may recover the amounts specified in Section 2983 from the person to whom payment was made.

(e) When a conditional sale contract is not enforceable under Section 2983 or this section, the buyer may elect to retain the motor vehicle and continue the contract in force, or may, with reasonable diligence, elect to rescind the contract and return the motor vehicle. The value of the motor vehicle returned shall be credited as restitution by the buyer without any decrease that results from the passage of time in the cash price of the motor vehicle as the price appears on the conditional sale contract.

(f) A conditional sale contract executed or entered into on or after January 1, 2012, shall not be made unenforceable, and the buyer shall not be excused from payment of any finance
 charge, solely because of a violation by the seller of paragraph (2) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 2982. In addition to any other remedies that may be available, the buyer is entitled to any actual damages sustained as a result of a violation of those provisions. Nothing in this subdivision affects any legal rights, claims, or remedies otherwise available under law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 283, Sec. 5.   (AB 2311)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2983.2.

(a) Except where the motor vehicle has been seized as described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 2983.3, any provision in any conditional sale contract for the sale of a motor vehicle to the contrary notwithstanding, at least 15 days’ written notice of intent to dispose of a repossessed or surrendered motor vehicle shall be given to all persons liable on the contract. The notice shall be personally served or shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, or first-class mail, postage prepaid, directed to the last known address of the persons liable on the contract. If those persons are married to each other, and, according to the most recent records of the seller or holder of the contract, reside at the same address, one notice addressed to both persons at that
 address is sufficient. Except as otherwise provided in Section 2983.8, those persons shall be liable for any deficiency after disposition of the repossessed or surrendered motor vehicle only if the notice prescribed by this section is given within 60 days of repossession or surrender and does all of the following:

(1) Sets forth that those persons shall have a right to redeem the motor vehicle by paying in full the indebtedness evidenced by the contract until the expiration of 15 days from the date of giving or mailing the notice and provides an itemization of the contract balance and of any delinquency, collection or repossession costs and fees and sets forth the computation or estimate of the amount of any credit for unearned finance charges or canceled insurance as of the date of the notice.

(2) States either that there is a conditional right to reinstate the contract until the
 expiration of 15 days from the date of giving or mailing the notice and all the conditions precedent thereto or that there is no right of reinstatement and provides a statement of reasons therefor.

(3) States that, upon written request, the seller or holder shall extend for an additional 10 days the redemption period or, if entitled to the conditional right of reinstatement, both the redemption and reinstatement periods. The seller or holder shall provide the proper form for applying for the extensions with the substance of the form being limited to the extension request, spaces for the requesting party to sign and date the form, and instructions that it must be personally served or sent by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to a person or office and address designated by the seller or holder and received before the expiration of the initial redemption and reinstatement periods.

(4) Discloses the place at which the motor vehicle will be returned to those persons upon redemption or reinstatement.

(5) Designates the name and address of the person or office to whom payment shall be made.

(6) States the seller’s or holder’s intent to dispose of the motor vehicle upon the expiration of 15 days from the date of giving or mailing the notice, or if by mail and either the place of deposit in the mail or the place of address is outside of this state, the period shall be 20 days instead of 15 days, and further, that upon written request to extend the redemption period and any applicable reinstatement period for 10 days, the seller or holder shall without further notice extend the period accordingly.

(7) Informs those persons that upon written
 request, the seller or holder will furnish a written accounting regarding the disposition of the motor vehicle as provided for in subdivision (b). The seller or holder shall advise them that this request must be personally served or sent first-class mail, postage prepaid, or certified mail, return receipt requested, to a person or office and address designated by the seller or holder.

(8) Includes notice, in at least 10-point bold type if the notice is printed, reading as follows: “NOTICE. YOU MAY BE SUBJECT TO SUIT AND LIABILITY IF THE AMOUNT OBTAINED UPON DISPOSITION OF THE VEHICLE IS INSUFFICIENT TO PAY THE CONTRACT BALANCE AND ANY OTHER AMOUNTS DUE.”

(9) Informs those persons that upon the disposition of the motor vehicle, they will be liable for the deficiency balance plus interest at the contract rate, or at the legal rate of interest pursuant to Section 3289 if there is no
 contract rate of interest, from the date of disposition of the motor vehicle to the date of entry of judgment.

The notice prescribed by this section shall not affect the discretion of the court to strike out an unconscionable interest rate in the contract for which the notice is required, nor affect the court in its determination of whether the rate is unconscionable.

(b) Unless automatically provided to the buyer within 45 days after the disposition of the motor vehicle, the seller or holder shall provide to any person liable on the contract within 45 days after their written request, if the request is made within one year after the disposition, a written accounting regarding the disposition. The accounting shall itemize:

(1) The gross proceeds of the disposition.

(2) The
 reasonable and necessary expenses incurred for retaking, holding, preparing for and conducting the sale and to the extent provided for in the agreement and not prohibited by law, reasonable attorney fees and legal expenses incurred by the seller or holder in retaking the motor vehicle from any person not a party to the contract.

(3) The satisfaction of indebtedness secured by any subordinate lien or encumbrance on the motor vehicle if written notification of demand therefor is received before distribution of the proceeds is completed. If requested by the seller or holder, the holder of a subordinate lien or encumbrance must seasonably furnish reasonable proof of its interest, and unless it does so, the seller or holder need not comply with its demand.

(c) In all sales which result in a surplus, the seller or holder shall furnish an accounting as provided in subdivision (b) whether
 or not requested by the buyer. Any surplus shall be returned to the buyer within 45 days after the sale is conducted.

(d) This section does not apply to a loan made by a lender licensed under Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) of the Financial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 28.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2983.3.

(a) (1) In the absence of default in the performance of any of the buyer’s obligations under the contract, the seller or holder may not accelerate the maturity of any part or all of the amount due thereunder or repossess the motor vehicle.

(2) Neither the act of filing a petition commencing a case for bankruptcy under Title 11 of the United States Code by the buyer or other individual liable on the contract nor the status of either of those persons as a debtor in bankruptcy constitutes a default in the performance of any of the buyer’s
 obligations under the contract, and neither may be used as a basis for accelerating the maturity of any part or all of the amount due under the contract or for repossessing the motor vehicle. A provision of a contract that states that the act of filing a petition commencing a case for bankruptcy under Title 11 of the United States Code by the buyer or other individual liable on the contract or the status of either of those persons as a debtor in bankruptcy is a default is void and unenforceable.

(b) If after default by the buyer, the seller or holder repossesses or voluntarily accepts surrender of the motor vehicle, any person liable on the contract shall have a right to reinstate the contract and the seller or holder shall not accelerate the maturity of any part or all of the contract prior to
 expiration of the right to reinstate, unless the seller or holder reasonably and in good faith determines that any of the following has occurred:

(1) The buyer or any other person liable on the contract by omission or commission intentionally provided false or misleading information of material importance on the buyer’s or other person’s credit application.

(2) The buyer, any other person liable on the contract, or any permissive user in possession of the motor vehicle, in order to avoid repossession has concealed the motor vehicle or removed it from the state.

(3) The buyer, any
 other person liable on the contract, or any permissive user in possession of the motor vehicle, has committed or threatens to commit acts of destruction, or has failed to take care of the motor vehicle in a reasonable manner, so that the motor vehicle has become substantially impaired in value, or the buyer, any other person liable on the contract, or any nonoccasional permissive user in possession of the motor vehicle has failed to take care of the motor vehicle in a reasonable manner, so that the motor vehicle may become substantially impaired in value.

(4) The buyer or any other person liable on the contract has committed, attempted to commit, or threatened to commit criminal acts of violence or bodily harm against an agent, employee, or officer of the seller or holder in connection with the seller’s or
 holder’s repossession of or attempt to repossess the motor vehicle.

(5) The buyer has knowingly used the motor vehicle, or has knowingly permitted it to be used, in connection with the commission of a criminal offense, other than an infraction, as a consequence of which the motor vehicle has been seized by a federal, state, or local agency or authority pursuant to federal, state, or local law.

(6) The motor vehicle has been seized by a federal, state, or local public agency or authority pursuant to (A) Section 1324 of Title 8 of the United States Code or Part 274 of Title 8 of the Code of Federal Regulations, (B) Section 881 of Title 21 of the United States Code or Part 9 of Title 28 of the
 Code of Federal Regulations, or (C) other federal, state, or local law, including regulations, and, pursuant to that other law, the seizing authority, as a precondition to the return of the motor vehicle to the seller or holder, prohibits the return of the motor vehicle to the buyer or other person liable on the contract or any third person claiming the motor vehicle by or through them or otherwise effects or requires the termination of the property rights in the motor vehicle of the buyer or other person liable on the contract or claimants by or through them.

(c) Exercise of the right to reinstate the contract shall be limited to once in any 12-month period and twice during the term of the contract.

(d) The provisions of this subdivision cover the method by which a contract shall be reinstated with respect to curing events of default which were a ground for repossession or occurred subsequent to repossession:

(1) When the default is the result of the buyer’s failure to make any payment due under the contract, the buyer or any other person liable on the contract shall make the defaulted payments and pay any applicable delinquency charges.

(2) When the default is the result of the buyer’s failure to keep and maintain the motor vehicle free from all encumbrances and liens of every kind, the buyer or any other person liable on the contract shall
 either satisfy all encumbrances and liens or, in the event the seller or holder satisfies the encumbrances and liens, the buyer or any other person liable on the contract shall reimburse the seller or holder for all reasonable costs and expenses incurred therefor.

(3) When the default is the result of the buyer’s failure to keep and maintain insurance on the motor vehicle, the buyer or any other person liable on the contract shall either obtain the insurance or, in the event the seller or holder has obtained the insurance, the buyer or any other person liable on the contract shall reimburse the seller or holder for premiums paid and all reasonable costs and expenses, including, but not limited to, any finance charge in connection with the premiums permitted by Section 2982.8, incurred
 therefor.

(4) When the default is the result of the buyer’s failure to perform any other obligation under the contract, unless the seller or holder has made a good faith determination that the default is so substantial as to be incurable, the buyer or any other person liable on the contract shall either cure the default or, if the seller or holder has performed the obligation, reimburse the seller or holder for all reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection therewith.

(5) Additionally, the buyer or any other person liable on the contract shall, in all cases, reimburse the seller or holder for all reasonable and necessary collection and repossession costs and fees actually
 paid by the seller or holder, including attorney’s fees and legal expenses expended in retaking and holding the vehicle.

(e) If the seller or holder denies the right to reinstatement under subdivision (b) or paragraph (4) of subdivision (d), the seller or holder shall have the burden of proof that the denial was justified in that it was reasonable and made in good faith. If the seller or holder fails to sustain the burden of proof, the seller or holder shall not be entitled to a deficiency, but it shall not be presumed that the buyer is entitled to damages by reason of the failure of the seller or holder to sustain the burden of proof.

(f) This section does not apply to a loan made by a lender licensed
 under Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) of the Financial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 716, Sec. 1.   (SB 1099)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2983.35.

(a) If a creditor has requested a cosigner as a condition of granting credit to any person for the purpose of acquisition of a motor vehicle, the creditor or holder shall give the cosigner a written notice of delinquency prior to the repossession of the motor vehicle if the motor vehicle is to be repossessed pursuant to the motor vehicle credit agreement. The written notice of delinquency shall be personally served or shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, or first-class mail, postage prepaid, directed to the last
known address of the cosigner. If the last known address of the buyer and the cosigner are the same, a single written notice of delinquency given to both the borrower and cosigner prior to repossession satisfies the cosigner notice requirement of this section.

(b) A creditor or holder who fails to comply with this section may not recover any costs associated with the repossession of the vehicle from the cosigner.

(c) This section applies to any motor vehicle credit agreement, notwithstanding Section 2982.5.

(d) The following definitions govern the construction of this section.

(1) “Cosigner” means a buyer who executes a motor vehicle credit agreement but does not in fact receive possession of the motor vehicle that is the subject of the agreement.

(2) “Creditor” means a seller or lender described in paragraph (4).

(3) “Holder” means any other person who is entitled to enforce the motor vehicle credit agreement.

(4) “Motor vehicle credit agreement” means any conditional sales contract as defined in Section 2981 and any contract or agreement in which a lender gives value to enable a purchaser to acquire a motor vehicle and in which the lender obtains a security interest in the motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2983.37.

(a) After a sale of a vehicle under this chapter, a buy-here-pay-here dealer, as defined in Section 241 of the Vehicle Code, shall not do any of the following:

(1) Utilize electronic tracking technology to obtain or record the location of the vehicle, unless the buyer is expressly made aware of the existence and use of the tracking
technology by the buy-here-pay-here dealer, the buyer’s written consent is obtained, and either subparagraph (A) or (B), or both, apply:

(A) The electronic tracking technology is used solely to verify and maintain the operational status of the tracking technology, to repossess the vehicle, or to locate the vehicle to service the loan or keep the loan current.

(B) The electronic tracking technology is used solely for any optional service to the buyer and both of the following conditions are met:

(i) The agreement to utilize electronic tracking technology for the optional service is separate from the purchase and sale agreement, is not a condition of the purchase or sale agreement for the vehicle, and is executed after the completion of the purchase or sale agreement for the vehicle.

(ii) The buyer is permitted to cancel the optional service at any point in the future without affecting the sale of the vehicle, and is informed of his or her ability to do so.

(2) Disable the vehicle by using starter interrupt technology, unless the buy-here-pay-here dealer complies with all of the following provisions:

(A) Notifies the buyer in writing at the time of the sale that the vehicle is equipped with starter interrupt technology, which the buy-here-pay-here dealer can use to shut down the vehicle remotely.

(B) The written disclosure provided to the buyer at the time of sale informs the buyer that a warning will be provided five days before the use of the starter interrupt technology for all weekly payment term contracts and 10 days before the
use of starter interrupt technology on all other contracts, and a final warning will be provided no less than 48 hours before the use of the starter interrupt technology to shut down the vehicle remotely and discloses the manner and method in which that warning will occur. The dealer shall offer the buyer a choice of warning methods, including warning from the device, telephone call, email, or text message, if available, provided that the warning method does not violate applicable state or federal law.

(C) The written disclosure provided to the buyer at the time of sale informs the buyer that in the event of an emergency, the buyer will be provided with the ability to start a dealer-disabled vehicle for no less than 24 hours after the vehicle’s initial disablement.

(b) A buy-here-pay-here dealer shall not require the buyer to make payments to the seller in person. For purposes of
this subdivision, “payments” does not include the downpayment. If the buyer tenders timely payment of a deferred downpayment, the dealer shall not repossess the vehicle or impose any other charge or penalty on the grounds that the payment was not made in person.

(c) Each violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 179, Sec. 1.   (AB 265)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2983.4.

Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs shall be awarded to the prevailing party in any action on a contract or purchase order subject to the provisions of this chapter regardless of whether the action is instituted by the seller, holder or buyer. Where the defendant alleges in his answer that he tendered to the plaintiff the full amount to which he was entitled, and thereupon deposits in court, for the plaintiff, the amount so tendered, and the allegation is found to be true, then the defendant is deemed to be a prevailing party within the meaning of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

2983.5.

(a) An assignee of the seller’s right is subject to all equities and defenses of the buyer against the seller, notwithstanding an agreement to the contrary, but the assignee’s liability may not exceed the amount of the debt owing to the assignee at the time of the assignment.

(b) The assignee shall have recourse against the seller to the extent of any liability incurred by the assignee pursuant to this section regardless of whether the assignment was with or without recourse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 66.)
-------------------------------------------

2983.6.

Any person who shall willfully violate any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1338.)
-------------------------------------------

2983.7.

No conditional sale contract shall contain any provision by which:

(a) The buyer agrees not to assert against the seller a claim or defense arising out of the sale or agrees not to assert against an assignee such a claim or defense.

(b) A power of attorney is given to confess judgment in this state, or an assignment of wages is given; provided, that nothing herein contained shall prohibit the giving of an assignment of wages contained in a separate instrument pursuant to Section 300 of the Labor Code.

(c) The buyer waives any right of action against the seller or holder of the contract or other person acting on his behalf, for any illegal act committed in the collection of payments under the contract or in the repossession of the motor vehicle.

(d) The buyer executes a power of attorney appointing the seller or holder of the contract, or other person acting on his behalf, as the buyer’s agent in the collection of payments under the contract or in the repossession of the motor vehicle.

(e) The buyer relieves the seller from liability for any legal remedies which the buyer may have against the seller under the contract or any separate instrument executed in connection therewith.

(f) The seller or holder of the contract is given the right to commence action
on a contract under the provisions of this chapter in a county other than the county in which the contract was in fact signed by the buyer, the county in which the buyer resides at the commencement of the action, the county in which the buyer resided at the time the contract was entered into, or in the county in which the motor vehicle purchased pursuant to such contract is permanently garaged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1288.)
-------------------------------------------

2983.8.

Notwithstanding Section 2983.2 or any other provision of law, no deficiency judgment shall lie in any event in any of the following instances:

(a) After any sale of any mobilehome for which a permit is required pursuant to Section 35780 or 35790 of the Vehicle Code for failure of the purchaser to complete his or her conditional sale contract given to the seller to secure payment of the balance of the purchase price of such mobilehome. The provisions of this
subdivision shall not apply in the event there is substantial damage to the mobilehome other than wear and tear from normal usage. This subdivision shall apply only to contracts entered into on or after the effective date of the act that enacted this subdivision and before July 1, 1981.

(b) After any sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle unless the court has determined that the sale or other disposition was in conformity with the provisions of this chapter and the relevant provisions of Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code, including Sections 9610, 9611, 9612, 9613, 9614, 9615, and 9626. The determination may be made upon an affidavit unless the court requires a hearing in the particular case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

2984.

Any failure to comply with any provision of this chapter (commencing with Section 2981) may be corrected by the holder, provided, however, that a willful violation may not be corrected unless it is a violation appearing on the face of the contract and is corrected within 30 days of the execution of the contract or within 20 days of its sale, assignment or pledge, whichever is later, provided that the 20-day period shall commence with the initial sale, assignment or pledge of the contract, and provided that any other violation appearing on the face of the contract may be corrected only within such time periods. A correction which will increase the amount of the contract
balance or the amount of any installment as such amounts appear on the conditional sale contract shall not be effective unless the buyer concurs in writing to the correction. If notified in writing by the buyer of such a failure to comply with any provision of this chapter, the correction shall be made within 10 days of notice. Where any provision of a conditional sale contract fails to comply with any provision of this chapter, the correction shall be made by mailing or delivering a corrected copy of the contract to the buyer. Any amount improperly collected by the holder from the buyer shall be credited against the indebtedness evidenced by the contract or returned to the buyer. A violation corrected as provided in this section shall not be the basis of any recovery by the buyer or affect the enforceability of the contract by the holder and shall not be deemed to be a substantive change in the agreement of the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 838.)
-------------------------------------------

2984.1.

Every conditional sale contract shall contain a statement in contrasting red print in at least 8-point bold type which shall satisfy the requirements of Section 5604 of the Vehicle Code and be signed or initialed by the buyer, as follows:

THE MINIMUM PUBLIC LIABILITY INSURANCE LIMITS PROVIDED IN LAW MUST BE MET BY EVERY PERSON WHO PURCHASES A VEHICLE. IF YOU ARE UNSURE WHETHER OR NOT YOUR CURRENT INSURANCE POLICY WILL COVER YOUR NEWLY ACQUIRED VEHICLE IN THE EVENT OF AN ACCIDENT, YOU SHOULD CONTACT YOUR INSURANCE AGENT. 

WARNING: 
YOUR PRESENT POLICY MAY NOT COVER COLLISION DAMAGE OR MAY NOT PROVIDE FOR FULL REPLACEMENT COSTS
FOR THE VEHICLE BEING PURCHASED. IF YOU DO NOT HAVE FULL COVERAGE, SUPPLEMENTAL COVERAGE FOR COLLISION DAMAGE MAY BE AVAILABLE TO YOU THROUGH YOUR INSURANCE AGENT OR THROUGH THE SELLING DEALER. HOWEVER, UNLESS OTHERWISE SPECIFIED, THE COVERAGE YOU OBTAIN THROUGH THE DEALER PROTECTS ONLY THE DEALER, USUALLY UP TO THE AMOUNT OF THE UNPAID BALANCE REMAINING AFTER THE VEHICLE HAS BEEN REPOSSESSED AND SOLD. 

FOR ADVICE ON FULL COVERAGE THAT WILL PROTECT YOU IN THE EVENT OF LOSS OR DAMAGE TO YOUR VEHICLE, YOU SHOULD CONTACT YOUR INSURANCE AGENT. 

THE BUYER SHALL SIGN TO ACKNOWLEDGE THAT HE/SHE UNDERSTANDS THESE PUBLIC LIABILITY TERMS AND CONDITIONS. 
s/s ____________. 

No person shall print for use as a sales contract form, any form which does not comply with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 177, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2984.2.

(a) No conditional sale contract, and no agreement between a seller and a buyer made in connection with a conditional sale contract, may provide for the inclusion of title to or a lien upon any property other than the following: 

(1) The motor vehicle which is the subject matter of the sale, including any replacement of that motor vehicle, or accessories, accessions, or replacement of those accessories or accessions, or proceeds thereof.

(2) The proceeds of any insurance policies covering the motor
vehicle which are required by the seller or the returned premiums of any such policies if the premiums for such policies are included in the amount financed.

(3) The proceeds of any credit insurance policies which the buyer purchases in connection with the motor vehicle conditional sale contract or the returned premiums of any such policies if the premiums for such policies are included in the amount financed.

(4) The proceeds and returned price of any service contract if the cost of such contract is included in the amount financed.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any agreement which meets the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 2982.5 and otherwise complies with this chapter, nor, with respect to a mobilehome sold prior to July 1, 1981, to any agreement whereby a security interest is taken in real
property on which the mobilehome is installed on a foundation system pursuant to Section 18551 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) A provision in violation of this section shall be void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1043, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2984.3.

Any acknowledgment by the buyer of delivery of a copy of a conditional sale contract or purchase order and any vehicle purchase proposal and any credit statement that the seller has required or requested the buyer to sign, and that he or she has signed, during the contract negotiations, shall be printed or written in size equal to at least 10-point boldface type and, if contained in the contract, shall appear directly above the space reserved for the buyer’s signature or adjacent to any other notices required by law to be placed immediately above the
signature space. The buyer’s written acknowledgment, conforming to the requirements of this section, of delivery of a completely filled-in copy of the contract, and a copy of the other documents shall be a rebuttable presumption of delivery in any action or proceeding by or against a third party without knowledge to the contrary when he or she acquired his or her interest in the contract. If the third party furnishes the buyer a copy of the documents, or a notice containing the disclosures identified in subdivision (a) of Section 2982, and stating that the buyer shall notify the third party in writing within 30 days if a copy of the documents was not furnished, and that notification is not given, it shall be conclusively presumed in favor of the third party that copies of the documents were furnished as required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2984.4.

(a) An action on a contract or purchase order under this chapter shall be tried in the superior court in the county where the contract or purchase order was in fact signed by the buyer, where the buyer resided at the time the contract or purchase order was entered into, where the buyer resides at the commencement of the action, or where the motor vehicle purchased pursuant to the contract or purchase order is permanently garaged.

In any action involving multiple claims, or causes of action,
venue shall lie in those courts if there is at least one claim or cause of action arising from a contract subject to this chapter.
